Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 15. Storage Batteries.

§ 59.1-189.
Labels and stamps required.

No storage batteries intended for use in connection in any manner with the operation of any machine, motor, radio or any mechanical device or in connection with the production of any artificial light shall be sold or offered for sale in this Commonwealth
unless there is affixed to such batteries a label or stamp showing, or the seller of such batteries has available for customer inspection documentation that shows the name and address of the manufacturer, date on which the manufacture
of such battery was completed, the size of the container and whether the container is made of rubber or a composition, the number and thickness of plates in each cell, the name of the material used as a filler for the grids in the
plate, and the kind of woods or other materials used as separators between the plates.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-162; 1968, c. 439; 1990, c. 592.

§ 59.1-190.
Rebuilt batteries.

To every storage battery which has been rebuilt and offered for sale in this Commonwealth, there shall be, in addition to the label or stamp required by § 59.1-189, permanently affixed to the container and above label or stamp required by § 59.1-189,
the word “rebuilt,” together with the name and address of the person, firm or corporation rebuilding such battery.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-163; 1968, c. 439.

§ 59.1-191.
Penalty for violation.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than $250, or punished by imprisonment in jail for not more than six months or
by both fine and imprisonment.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-164; 1968, c. 439.